Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,215
Snowmobiles; licensing or registration by political subdivision prohibited.

No political subdivision of this state shall require licensing or registration of snowmobiles covered by the provisions of sections 60-3,207 to 60-3,219.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 215.